Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 61.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
81-188.01
State Building
Renewal Assessment Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)
The State Building Renewal Assessment Fund is created. The fund shall be under
the control of the Governor for allocation to building renewal projects of
the various agencies and shall be administered in a manner consistent with
the administration of the Building Renewal Allocation Fund pursuant to the
Deferred Building Renewal Act. No amounts accruing to the State Building Renewal
Assessment Fund shall be expended in any manner for purposes other than as
provided in this section or as appropriated by the Legislature to meet the
cost of administering the act. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

(2) Revenue credited to the State
Building Renewal Assessment Fund shall include amounts derived
from charges assessed pursuant to subdivision (4)(b) of section 81-1108.17,
depreciation charges remitted pursuant to section 81-188.02, and such other
revenue as may be incident to the administration of the fund.

(3) Amounts appropriated from the fund shall be expended
to conduct renewal work as defined in section 81-173 and to complete other
improvements incident to such renewal work as deemed necessary or appropriate
by the task force. From amounts accruing to the fund as the result of depreciation
charges assessed pursuant to subdivision (4)(b) of section 81-1108.17, expenditures
for capital improvements shall be limited to improvements to only those facilities
for which such charges have been assessed and remitted. From amounts accruing
to the fund as the result of depreciation charges assessed pursuant to section
81-188.02, expenditures for capital improvement projects shall be limited
to exclude (a) capital improvement projects relating to facilities, structures,
or buildings owned, leased, or operated by the (i) University of Nebraska,
(ii) Nebraska state colleges, (iii) Department of Aeronautics, (iv) Department
of Roads, (v) Game and Parks Commission, or (vi) Board of Educational Lands
and Funds and (b) capital improvement projects relating to facilities, structures,
or buildings for which depreciation charges are assessed pursuant to subdivision
(4)(b) of section 81-1108.17. For each fiscal year, task force allocations
from amounts accruing to the fund pursuant to section 81-188.02 shall not
exceed the total of such revenue credited to the fund in the preceding fiscal
year, except that if no revenue from depreciation charge assessments was credited
to the fund in the preceding fiscal year, allocations shall not exceed fifty
percent of revenue credited to the fund in the last preceding fiscal year
in which depreciation charge assessments were credited to the fund.

(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1100, § 8;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 22;

Laws 2002, LB 1310, § 13;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 410, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 1092, § 2;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 61.
November 21, 2009
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.